apertium-sme-smj.smj.lexc
LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP					!^C^
 ½+Num+Use/Circ:½ # ;						!
 ¹+Num+Use/Circ:¹ # ;						!
 ²+Num+Use/Circ:² # ;						!
 ³+Num+Use/Circ:³ # ;						!
 ¼+Num+Use/Circ:¼ # ;						!



! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !


! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON Abbreviation
        ITRAB ;     
        TRNUMAB ;
        TRAB ;  

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
 ab-nodot ;
 ab-dot ;

! Some of these POS
!LEXICON ab-noun-adj
! ab-noun ;
! ab-adj ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-adj
 ab-dot-noun ;
 ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-noun
 ab-nodot-noun ;
 ab-dot-noun ;

LEXICON ab-adj
 ab-nodot-adj ;
 ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-adv
 ab-nodot-adv ;
 ab-dot-adv ;

LEXICON ab-num
 ab-nodot-num ;
 ab-dot-num;

!still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-cc
!ab-nodot-cc ;
!ab-dot-cc ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk 
 +N+ABBR+Attr:%> # ;  ! no period, that is. 
 +N+ABBR+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR+Ill:%>%:j # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR+Ine:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR+Ela:%>%:s # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR+Com:%>%:jn # ; ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR+Ess:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj
!+ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Attr:%> # ;  ! no period, that is. 
 +A+ABBR+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Ill:%>%:j # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Ine:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Ela:%>%:s # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Com:%>%:jn # ; ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR+Ess:%>%:n # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +A+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv
! +ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR:%> # ;      ! Adv without case, consider this.
! +ABBR+Adv+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is. 
! +ABBR+Adv+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
! +ABBR+Adv:%>%- RAbbr ;
 
LEXICON ab-nodot-num
!+ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +Num+ABBR+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +Num+ABBR+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +Num+ABBR+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +Num+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;


! Still not in use.
!LEXICON ab-nodot-cc
! +ABBR+CC:%> # ;  ! no period, that is. 

! we assume abbrs are nouns.

LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
!+ABBR:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR+Attr:%> # ;  ! no period, that is. 
 +N+ABBR+Nom:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR+Acc:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR+Gen:%> # ;  ! no period, that is.
 +N+ABBR:%>%- RAbbr ;


! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;  
 +N+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;  
 +N+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +N+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-adj ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +A+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;  
 +A+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +A+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +A+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-adv ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 +Adv+ABBR:%.%> # ;        ! Adv without case.
! +Adv+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ;  
! +Adv+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
! +Adv+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
! +Adv+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 
 
LEXICON ab-dot-num ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
 +Num+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
 +Num+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
 +Num+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-cc
 +CC+ABBR:%.%> # ;  

! Adding case suffixes to the abbrs in a tentative manner, to test it
! out. The problem with the original treatment represented by the first, 
! outcommented member of the two lexica) is that especially intransiv


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

!LEXICON ab-verb ! A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
! ab-dot-verb ;
! ab-nodot-verb ;
! Not in use
LEXICON ab-dot-verb
 +V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%.%>   # ; ! Period.

!LEXICON ab-nodot-verb 
! +ABBR+V+TV+Imprt:%>    # ; ! No period.
! Not in use.
 
 

  
! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------



! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON TRNUMAB
! For abbrs for which numerals are complements, but other
! words not necessarily are. This group treats arabic numerals as
! if it were transitive but letters as if it were intransitive.
! TODO: Bug the fact that these abbrs do not distinguish between
! cap and small letters, whereast he ITRAB ones do.



 Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
bie		ab-dot ;
 Bnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
!Gieldanr	ab-dot-noun ;
 Gnr		ab-noun ;                                 !
Kommune#nr	ab-dot-noun ;
 Pb		ab-noun ; ! Postbox 
!Poastanr	ab-dot-noun ;
Post#nr		ab-dot-noun ;
 Rt		ab-dot ;                                      !
 S.nr		ab-noun ;                                 !
Suohkan#nr	ab-dot-noun ;
 O.nr		ab-noun ;                                 !
 alm		ab-dot ;                                      !
 b		ab ; ! b. is a transitive abbr as in geas. 12.! b. 2001.
 bnr		ab-noun ;                                 !
!čk		ab-dot ;                                      !
fnr		ab-noun ;
 gnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
 j+Use/Circ:j ab-dot;                                      ! !
 jnr		ab-dot ;                                      !
 kap	ab-nodot-noun ;                           !
 kap:kap		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
 kr		ab ;                                          !
!mátke#tlf	ab-dot-noun ;
 nr		ab-noun ; ! Nr nicht                          !
 rieg		ab-dot-verb ; !riegádan
 s+Use/Circ:s ab-noun;                                     ! !
 tab:tab	ab ; ! or: Add capital Tab.               !
 dii		ab-dot ;                                      !
 tlf		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
 vnr		ab-dot-noun ;                                 !




! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !
                              

LEXICON ITRAB
 3p+Use/Circ:3p ab;	!                    !
abl		ab-noun ;
abstr		ab-adj ;
adj		ab-noun ;
advl		ab-noun ;
 akk/gen+Use/Circ:akk/gen ab-noun;	!
akt		ab ;
attr		ab ;
 bfr		ab-nodot ;                      !
 biol		ab-dot-adj ;                !
 bot		ab-dot-adj ;                    !
 r+Use/Circ:r ab-dot-adj;                    ! !
 c/o+Use/Circ:c/o ab-nodot;	!        !
 cal		ab ;                            !
 can$+Use/Circ:can$ ab-nodot;	!            !
 cm		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
 daa		ab-nodot ;                      !
 dB		ab-nodot ;                      !
 d.d		ab-dot ;                        !
 ded		ab-dot-noun ;                   !
dem:dem	ab ;
 dg		ab-nodot ;                      !
 dl		ab-nodot-noun ;                      !
 dus		ab-dot ;                        !
ess:ess9	ab-noun ;
 etc		ab-dot-adv ;                    !
 f+Use/Circ:f ab;                            ! !
 ff		ab ;                            !
 fr		ab ;                            !
 geogr		ab-dot-adj ; !geografiijas  !
 geom		ab-dot-adj ; !geometrihkala !š
ger		ab-dot ;
ha         ab-nodot ;
 h+Use/Circ:h ab;                            ! !
 hg		ab-nodot-noun ;                 !
 ib		ab-nodot ;                      !
 ibid	ab-nodot ;                  !
ill		ab-noun ;
impers		ab-dot ;
impf		ab ;
imprt		ab-noun ;
instr		ab ;
interr		ab-dot-adj ;
intr		ab-dot-adj ;
 j.e	ab-dot ;                            !
 je		ab-dot ;                        !
 jná		ab-adv ; !ja nåv ájn             !
 j.n.v ab-dot-adv ; !ja nav vijdábun !
 jnv		ab-adv ;                        !
 js		ab-dot ;                        !
 jur		ab-dot-adj ; !juridihkalaš      !
kg		ab-nodot-noun ;
km³		ab-nodot-noun ;
kom:kom		ab ;
kond		ab ;
 konkr		ab-dot-adj; !konkrehta
 Kr		ab-noun ;                             !
kV		ab-nodot ;
kvm		ab-nodot ;
kl		ab-nodot ;
kWh		ab-nodot-noun ;
 lok		ab-dot-noun ; !lokatiiva
 m+Use/Circ:m ab-noun; !
 matem		ab-dot-adj ; !matematihkalaš
milj	ab-num ;
miljo	ab-dot-num ;
 mill	ab-nodot-num ; !But this is also used with dot
mKr			ab-dot ;
 mm²+Use/Circ:mm² ab-nodot-noun;	!
mrd	ab-num ;
mV	ab-nodot ;
mW	ab-nodot ;
nom:nom		ab-noun ;
 o.Kr	ab-dot-adv ; !Does this exist?
wo        ab-nodot ;
oKr	ab-dot-adv ;
perf	ab-dot ;
pH	ab-nodot-noun ;
pl	ab-dot ;
pres	ab ;
prs	ab-dot-noun ;
prt		ab ;
prv	ab-dot ;
pvc	ab-nodot ;
refl	ab-adj ;
 relat	ab-dot-adj ; !relatiiva
sg		ab-dot ;
subj		ab-noun ;
 temp		ab-dot-noun ; !temporála
 á+Use/Circ:á ab;                            ! !
LEXICON TRAB                  
 avd		ab-dot-noun ;              !
bs ab-dot-verb ;
 buo		ab-dot ;              !
 cand.scient	  ab-dot-noun ;   !
 dr.art			  ab-dot-noun ;    !doktor artium
 et        ab-nodot ;               !
fob    ab-nodot-noun ;
gt    ab-dot-noun ;
liks    ab-nodot-noun ;
lingv    ab-dot-noun ;
op    ab-dot-noun ;
pos    ab-dot-noun ;
ps    ab-nodot-noun ;
yd    ab-nodot-noun ;
sic    ab-dot-noun ;
al    ab-nodot-noun ;
 ea.ea			  ab ; ! 15 %- ea.ea without final dot.!
 eksp.hoavd	  ab-dot-noun ;                                !
 eren			  ab-dot-adj ;                            !
 eŋg			  ab-dot-noun-adj;                        !
 genr.lt		  ab-dot-noun ;                 !
 snju	ab-nodot-noun ;                                 !
 snji	ab-nodot-noun ;                                 !
 javl	ab-nodot-noun ;                                 !
 gárj		  ab-dot ;                 !
 isl		  ab-dot ;                     !
 Joh:Joh	ab-noun ;         !Johannes
 milj		  ab-dot-num ;             !
 mársm	ab-dot-noun ;                                 !
 ng		  ab-dot ;                     !
 Ot.prp		ab-noun ;              !
 ped		  ab-dot ;                     !padagoga, pedagogihkka, pedagogalaš
 pharm	  ab-dot-adj ;                 !
 polit		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
 priv		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
 pro		  ab ;                         !
 prp	  ab-nodot-noun ;               !
 psyk		  ab-dot-adj ;             !
 resipr	ab-dot-adj ; !resiprohka TRAB or ITRAB?
 Rom:Rom	ab-noun ;         !Girje romalaččaide
 Sd.prp.nr	ab-noun ;         !
 St.meld		ab-noun ;         !
 St.prp.nr	ab-noun ;         !Stortingsproposisjon nummer
 su          ab-dot-adv ;               ! sullii
 suodinem	ab-dot-noun ;                             !
 vs		  ab-dot-cc ;                  !
 vsá		  ab-dot ;                     !
 M+Use/Circ:M ab-dot-noun; !
 O+Use/Circ:O ab-noun; !
